Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PROGRAMS AND SERVICES
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(1) Establish programs that are peer and community  driven that ensure access to cul-
turally specific and culturally responsive behavioral health services for people of color,  tribal
communities and people of lived experience.
(2) Provide medical assistance reimbursement for tribal-based practices.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Health Authority shall reimburse the cost of co-occurring
mental health and substance use disorder  treatment services paid for on a fee-for-service
basis at an enhanced rate based on:
(1) Existing reimbursement codes used for co-occurring disorder treatments;
(2) Clinical complexity; and
(3) The education level of the provider.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Health Authority shall provide one-time  start-up funding for
behavioral health  treatment programs that provide integrated co-occurring disorder treat-
ment.
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 1
SECTION 4. The Oregon Health Authority shall conduct a study of reimbursement  rates
for co-occurring disorder treatments, including  treatment of a co-occurring intellectual and
developmental disability and problem gambling disorder.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $10,200,000, which may be expended for carrying out sections
2 to 4 of this 2021 Act.
WORKFORCE
SECTION 6. The Oregon Health Authority shall continually evaluate and revise  adminis-
trative rules governing behavioral health programs  and services to reduce the administrative
burden of documentation, particularly  around assessment and treatment planning, the
measures and outcomes tracking system or successor systems and other  reporting required
for providers seeking certificates of approval and to ensure that the rules are consistent with
the medical assistance program administrative rules that apply  to behavioral health care
staff operating in primary care and other settings.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall conduct a study of Medicaid rates paid
for:
(a) Behavioral health services compared to physical health services; and
(b) Addiction treatment services  compared to mental health services to providers with
equivalent levels of education and training.
(2) No later than February 1, 2022, the  authority shall report to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to behavioral and mental  health, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245,  the results of the study conducted under subsection (1) of this section and
recommendations for:
(a) Achieving a living wage for behavioral health care workers,  including additional
treatment providers, peers and family support specialists; and
(b) Providing more equitable wages between physical health care workers  and behavioral
health care workers.
SECTION 8.
The Oregon Health Authority, with the advice of stakeholders and  the Al-
cohol and Drug Policy  Commission, may establish minimum rates of reimbursement paid by
the authority or coordinated  care organizations to addiction treatment providers to ensure
medical assistance recipients’  access, without delay, to all modalities of addiction treatment
within each geographic region of this state.
SECTION 9.  The Oregon  Health Authority shall contract with a third-party vendor to
survey medical assistance  recipients about their experiences with behavioral health care and
services using a standardized survey tool.
SECTION 10. The Oregon Health Authority shall create workforce  training and establish
endorsements or certifications for behavioral health providers  of co-occurring disorder
treatment.
HOUSING
SECTION 11. The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by rule requirements for coordi-
nated care organizations to provide housing navigation services and address the  social de-
terminants of health through care coordination.
SECTION 12.  ORS 430.335 is amended to read:
430.335. In accordance with the policies, priorities and standards established by the  Alcohol and
Drug Policy Commission under ORS 430.223, and subject to  the availability of funds therefor, the
Oregon Health Authority may:
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 2
(1) Provide directly through publicly operated treatment facilities, which  shall not be considered
to be state  institutions, or by contract with publicly or privately operated profit or nonprofit treat-
ment facilities, for the care of [ alcoholics or drug-dependent persons ] individuals with substance
use disorders.
(2) Sponsor and encourage research of [ alcoholism and drug dependence ] substance use  disor-
ders.
(3) Seek to coordinate public and  private programs relating to [ alcoholism and drug
dependence] substance use disorders .
(4) Apply for federally granted funds available for study or prevention and treatment  of
[alcoholism and drug dependence ] substance use disorders .
(5) Directly or by contract  with public or private entities, administer financial assistance, loan
and other programs to assist the development of [ drug and alcohol free ] housing  for individuals
with substance use disorders .
DATA ON INTENSIVE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH TREATMENT
CAPACITY FOR CHILDREN AND ADOLESCENTS
SECTION 13.  ORS 430.717 is amended to read:
430.717. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Children and adolescents” means individuals 20 years old and younger.
(b) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Insurer” means an insurer, as defined in ORS 731.106, that has a  certificate of in-
surance to transact health insurance in this state, other than disability insurance.
(d) “Intensive behavioral health treatment provider” means any provider licensed  in this
state to provide intensive psychiatric treatment, acute inpatient treatment or residential
substance use disorder treatment of children and adolescents.
(2) Intensive  behavioral health treatment providers, coordinated care organizations and
insurers shall collect and provide data to the Oregon Health Authority,  or to a third party
vendor that contracts with the authority, in the  manner prescribed by the authority on the
demand for and capacity to provide treatment of children and  adolescents presenting with
high acuity behavioral health needs. Intensive  behavioral health treatment providers shall
submit:
(a) Data on bed capacity;
(b) Referrals received, by provider; and
(c) Other information prescribed by the authority.
(3) The authority may provide funding to intensive behavioral health  treatment providers
to collect and provide the data described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The authority shall use the data described in subsection (2) of this section to:
(a) Monitor and track the capacity of intensive behavioral health treatment providers to
provide treatment of children and  adolescents presenting with high acuity behavioral health
needs;
(b) Identify gaps in data that prevent the tracking of intensive behavioral  health service
capacity and develop a plan  for addressing the gaps that includes providing assistance to
providers and modifying required data elements that must be reported;
(c) Develop benchmarks and performance measures for intensive behavioral  health
treatment capacity; and
(d) Conduct research and evaluation of the children’s and adolescents’ continuum of care.
(5) The authority shall share data  and coordinate processes with the Department of Hu-
man Services to populate the Children’s System Data Dashboard described in ORS 418.981.
(6) The authority shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this  section, including
rules establishing:
(a) Parameters and specifications for data collection;
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 3
(b) Processes for intensive behavioral  health treatment providers to submit data for the
establishment of a centralized, real-time provider directory, bed registry and access portal;
(c) Requirements for the frequency of data submissions;
(d) Requirements for coordinated care organizations and insurers  to collect and report,
for members and insureds treated  by intensive behavioral health treatment providers, data
not submitted by providers under this section;
(e) A process for monitoring and  documenting the need for high acuity behavioral health
services for children and adolescents;
(f) The authority’s responsibilities for reporting data back to providers; and
(g) Measures to  ensure compliance with data collection standards established under sec-
tion 40, chapter 12, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
[(1)] (7) The  [ Oregon Health ] authority shall contract with an Oregon-based nonprofit organiza-
tion with the expertise to  operate a [ 24-hour] call center dedicated to tracking and providing infor-
mation about available placement settings for children and adolescents needing high acuity
behavioral health services.
[(2)] (8) The call center shall also be responsible for:
(a) Implementing processes for service providers to submit  data that can be used to assess and
monitor, on a daily basis, statewide capacity to provide high  acuity behavioral health services to
children and adolescents;
(b) Recording the time from the first contact with the  call center to the location of an appro-
priate placement; and
(c) Documenting the need for high acuity behavioral health  services for children and adoles-
cents.
SECTION 14.
(1) No later than December 1, 2022, the Oregon Health Authority shall  re-
port to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, and to the Governor recommendations to address:
(a) The demand and the  capacity for intensive behavioral health treatment for children
and adolescents.
(b) Barriers to data collection and provider compliance with ORS 430.717 (2).
(2) The report shall include:
(a) Recommendations for overcoming barriers to data collection; and
(b) A plan for expanding the referral data collection requirements to providers in  the
broader children’s continuum of care, including community behavioral health  services for
children and adolescents with lower-acuity  needs, and to adult intensive behavioral health
treatment providers.
SECTION 15.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $400,000, which may be expended for  carrying out the amend-
ments to ORS 430.717 by section 13 of this 2021 Act.
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH METRICS
SECTION 16.
 ORS 413.017 is amended to read:
413.017. (1) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall establish the committees described in  sub-
sections (2) to [ (4)] (5) of this section.
(2)(a) The Public Health Benefit  Purchasers Committee shall include individuals who purchase
health care for the following:
(A) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(B) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(C) Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(D) A city government.
(E) A county government.
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 4
(F) A special district.
(G) Any private nonprofit  organization that receives the majority of its funding from the state
and requests to participate on the committee.
(b) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall:
(A) Identify and make specific  recommendations to achieve uniformity across all public health
benefit plan designs based on the best available clinical evidence, recognized best  practices for
health promotion and disease management,  demonstrated cost-effectiveness and shared demographics
among the enrollees within the pools covered by the benefit plans.
(B) Develop an action plan for ongoing collaboration to implement the benefit design  alignment
described in subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph and shall leverage purchasing to achieve benefit
uniformity if practicable.
(C) Continuously review and report to  the Oregon Health Policy Board on the committee’s
progress in aligning benefits while minimizing the cost shift to individual purchasers of insurance
without shifting costs to the private sector or the health insurance exchange.
(c) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall work  with the Public Health Benefit Purchasers
Committee to identify uniform provisions for state  and local public contracts for health benefit plans
that achieve maximum quality and cost  outcomes. The board shall collaborate with the committee
to develop steps to implement joint contract provisions. The committee shall  identify a schedule for
the implementation of  contract changes. The process for implementation of joint contract provisions
must include a review process to protect against unintended cost shifts to enrollees or agencies.
(3)(a) The Health Care Workforce  Committee shall include individuals who have the collective
expertise, knowledge and experience in a broad range of  health professions, health care education
and health care workforce development initiatives.
(b) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall coordinate efforts to recruit  and educate health
care professionals and retain a quality workforce to meet the demand that will be  created by the
expansion in health care coverage, system transformations and an increasingly diverse population.
(c) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall conduct an inventory of all grants  and other
state resources available for addressing the need to expand the health care workforce to meet  the
needs of Oregonians for health care.
(4)(a) The Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee shall include the following members appointed
by the Oregon Health Policy Board:
(A) An individual representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) An individual representing the Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(C) An individual representing the Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(D) An individual representing the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(E) Two health care providers;
(F) One individual representing hospitals;
(G) One individual  representing insurers, large employers or multiple employer welfare ar-
rangements;
(H) Two individuals representing health care consumers;
(I) Two individuals representing coordinated care organizations;
(J) One individual with expertise in health care research;
(K) One individual with expertise in health care quality measures; and
(L) One individual with expertise in mental health and addiction services.
(b) The committee shall work collaboratively with the  Oregon Educators Benefit Board, the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board, the authority and the department to adopt  health outcome and
quality measures that are focused on specific goals and provide value to the state,  employers,
insurers, health care providers and consumers. The committee  shall be the single body to align
health outcome and quality measures used in this state  with the requirements of health care data
reporting to ensure that the measures  and requirements are coordinated, evidence-based and focused
on a long term statewide vision.
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 5
(c) The  committee shall use a public process that includes an opportunity for public comment
to identify health outcome and quality measures that may be applied to services provided by  coor-
dinated care organizations or paid for by health  benefit plans sold through the health insurance
exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators  Benefit Board or the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
The authority, the department, the Oregon Educators  Benefit Board and the Public Employees’
Benefit Board are not required to adopt all  of the health outcome and quality measures identified
by the committee but may not adopt any health outcome and quality measures  that are different
from the measures identified by the committee. The measures must take into account  the recom-
mendations of the metrics and scoring subcommittee created in ORS 414.638  and the differences in
the populations served by coordinated care organizations and by commercial insurers.
(d) In identifying health outcome and quality measures, the committee shall  prioritize measures
that:
(A) Utilize existing state  and national health outcome and quality measures, including measures
adopted by the Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid Services, that have been adopted or endorsed
by other state or national organizations and have a relevant state or national benchmark;
(B) Given the context in which each measure is applied, are not prone to  random variations
based on the size of the denominator;
(C) Utilize existing data systems, to the extent practicable, for  reporting the measures to mini-
mize redundant reporting and undue burden  on the state, health benefit plans and health care pro-
viders;
(D) Can be meaningfully adopted for a minimum of three years;
(E) Use a common format in the collection of the data and facilitate  the public reporting of the
data; and
(F) Can be reported in a timely manner and without significant delay  so that the most current
and actionable data is available.
(e) The committee shall evaluate on a regular and ongoing basis the health outcome and quality
measures adopted under this section.
(f) The committee may convene subcommittees to focus on gaining expertise in  particular areas
such as data collection,  health care research and mental health and substance use disorders in order
to aid the committee in the development of health outcome and  quality measures. A subcommittee
may include stakeholders and staff from the authority, the Department of  Human Services, the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services, the Early Learning Council or  any other agency staff
with the appropriate expertise in the issues addressed by the subcommittee.
(g) This subsection does not  prevent the authority, the Department of Consumer and Business
Services, commercial insurers,  the Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board from establishing programs that provide  financial incentives to providers for meeting specific
health outcome and quality measures adopted by the committee.
(5)(a) The Behavioral Health Committee shall include the following members appointed
by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority:
(A) The chairperson of the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee;
(B) The chairperson of the committee appointed by the board to address health equity,
if any;
(C) A behavioral health director for a coordinated care organization;
(D) A representative of a community mental health program;
(E) An individual with expertise in data analysis;
(F) A member of the Consumer Advisory  Council, established under ORS 430.073, that
represents adults with mental illness;
(G) A representative of the System of Care Advisory Council established in ORS 418.978;
(H) A member of the Oversight and Accountability Council, described in section 2,  chap-
ter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), who represents adults with addictions
or co-occurring conditions;
(I) One member representing a system of care, as defined in ORS 418.976;
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 6
(J) One consumer representative;
(K) One representative of a tribal government;
(L) One representative of an organization that advocates  on behalf of individuals with
intellectual or developmental disabilities;
(M) One representative of providers of behavioral health services;
(N) The director of the division of the authority responsible for behavioral  health ser-
vices, as a nonvoting member;
(O) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy  Commission appointed under ORS
430.220, as a nonvoting member;
(P) The authority’s Medicaid director, as a nonvoting member;
(Q) A representative of the Department  of Human Services, as a nonvoting member; and
(R) Any other member that the director deems appropriate.
(b) The board may modify the membership of the committee as needed.
(c) The division of the authority responsible for behavioral health  services and the di-
rector of the division shall staff the committee.
(d) The committee, in collaboration with  the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee, as
needed, shall:
(A) Establish quality metrics for behavioral health services provided  by coordinated care
organizations, health care providers, counties and other government entities; and
(B) Establish incentives to improve the quality of behavioral health services.
(e) The quality metrics and incentives shall be designed to:
(A) Improve timely access to behavioral health care;
(B) Reduce hospitalizations;
(C) Reduce overdoses;
(D) Improve the integration of physical and behavioral health care; and
(E) Ensure individuals are supported in the  least restrictive environment that meets
their behavioral health needs.
[(5)] (6)  Members of the committees described in subsections (2) to [ (4)] (5)  of this section who
are not members of the Oregon Health Policy Board are not entitled to compensation but shall be
reimbursed from funds available to the board for actual and  necessary travel and other expenses
incurred by them  by their attendance at committee meetings, in the manner and amount provided
in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 17.
Section 18 of  this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding ORS 414.590:
(1) Contracts between  the Oregon Health Authority and coordinated care organizations
or individual providers for the provision of behavioral health services must align  with the
quality metrics and incentives developed by the  Behavioral Health Committee under ORS
413.017 and contain provisions that ensure that:
(a) Individuals have easy access to needed care;
(b) Services are responsive to individual and community needs; and
(c) Services will lead to meaningful improvement in individuals’ lives.
(2) The authority must provide at least 90  days’ notice of changes needed to contracts
that are necessary to comply with subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 413.032 is amended to read:
413.032. (1) The Oregon Health Authority is established. The authority shall:
(a) Carry out policies adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board;
(b) Administer the Oregon Integrated  and Coordinated Health Care Delivery System established
in ORS 414.570;
(c) Administer the Oregon Prescription Drug Program;
(d) Develop the policies for and the provision of publicly funded medical care  and medical as-
sistance in this state;
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 7
(e) Develop the policies for and the provision of mental  health treatment and treatment of ad-
dictions;
(f) Assess, promote and protect the health of the public as specified by state and federal law;
(g) Provide regular reports to the board with  respect to the performance of health services
contractors serving recipients of  medical assistance, including reports of trends in health services
and enrollee satisfaction;
(h) Guide and support, with the authorization of the board, community-centered health initiatives
designed to address critical risk factors, especially those that contribute to chronic disease;
(i) Be the state Medicaid agency for the administration  of funds from Titles XIX and XXI of the
Social Security Act and administer medical assistance under ORS chapter 414;
(j) In consultation  with the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, pe-
riodically review and recommend standards and methodologies to the Legislative Assembly for:
(A) Review of administrative expenses of health insurers;
(B) Approval of rates; and
(C) Enforcement of rating rules adopted by the Department  of Consumer and Business Services;
(k) Structure reimbursement rates for providers that serve recipients  of medical assistance to
reward comprehensive management of diseases, quality outcomes and  the efficient use of resources
and to promote cost-effective  procedures, services and programs including, without limitation, pre-
ventive health, dental and  primary care services, web-based office visits, telephone consultations and
telemedicine consultations;
(L) Guide and support  community three-share agreements in which an employer, state or local
government and an individual all contribute a  portion of a premium for a community-centered health
initiative or for insurance coverage;
(m) Develop, in consultation with the Department of  Consumer and Business Services, one or
more products designed to provide more affordable options for the small group market;
(n) Implement policies and programs to expand the skilled, diverse workforce as described  in
ORS 414.018 (4); and
(o) Implement a  process for collecting the health outcome and quality measure data identified
by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee  and the Behavioral Health Committee  and report
the data to the Oregon Health Policy Board.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority is authorized to:
(a) Create  an all-claims, all-payer database to collect health care data and monitor and evaluate
health care reform in Oregon and  to provide comparative cost and quality information to consumers,
providers and purchasers of health care about Oregon’s health  care systems and health plan net-
works in order to provide comparative information to consumers.
(b) Develop uniform contracting standards for the  purchase of health care, including the fol-
lowing:
(A) Uniform quality standards and performance measures;
(B) Evidence-based guidelines for major  chronic disease management and health care services
with unexplained variations in frequency or cost;
(C) Evidence-based effectiveness guidelines for select new technologies and medical equipment;
(D) A statewide drug formulary that may be used by publicly funded health benefit plans; and
(E) Standards that accept and consider tribal-based practices for mental health and  substance
abuse prevention, counseling and treatment for persons who are  Native American or Alaska Native
as equivalent to evidence-based practices.
(3) The enumeration of  duties, functions and powers in this section is not intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and powers  imposed on or vested in the Oregon Health Au-
thority by ORS 413.006 to 413.042, 415.012 to 415.430 and 741.340 or by other statutes.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 414.025 is amended to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and  413, unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 8
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means  a payment other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an  evaluation by a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who is  working under a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician  whose authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an  individual’s mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate outpatient  treatment in an emergency de-
partment or admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s mental  or
physical  health.
(5) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance  use disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the Oregon  Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders  or substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental Income  Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to 411.896 and 412.001 to  412.069 or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health worker” means an individual who meets qualification  criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in  an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the  extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community where the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their  health and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated  care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for  enrollment
in a coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 9
(10)(a) “Family support specialist” means an individual who  meets qualification criteria adopted
by the  authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and has experience
parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health  and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
(11) “Global budget” means a total amount established prospectively by  the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a coordinated care organization for the  delivery of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
(12) “Health insurance exchange” or “exchange” means an American Health Benefit  Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
(13) “Health services” means at least so much of each of the following as are funded  by the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized list  of health services compiled by the Health Evi-
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse  practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health  clinician or other licensed practitioner within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and  (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal  law that may be included in the state’s medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(14) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(15)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to individuals and their families  in a pa-
tient centered  primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or  more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals  or qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 10
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(16) “Investments and savings” means cash, securities as defined  in ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS 73.0104  and such similar investments or savings as the department or
the authority may establish by rule that are available to  the applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(17) “Medical assistance” means so much  of the medical, mental health, preventive, supportive,
palliative and remedial care  and services as may be prescribed by the authority according to the
standards established pursuant  to ORS 414.065, including premium assistance and payments made for
services provided under an insurance or other contractual arrangement and money  paid directly to
the recipient for the purchase of health services and for services described in ORS 414.710.
(18) “Medical assistance” includes any care or services for any individual who is  a patient in
a medical institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age,  and who is a patient in a private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except as  provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(19) “Patient centered primary care home” means a  health care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards  established by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(20) “Peer support specialist” means any of the following  individuals who meet qualification
criteria adopted by the authority under ORS  414.665 and who provide supportive services to a cur-
rent or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An  individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder.
(21) “Peer wellness specialist” means an individual  who meets qualification criteria adopted by
the authority under ORS 414.665 and  who is responsible for assessing mental health and substance
use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care organization  through
community outreach, assisting members with access to available services and  resources, addressing
barriers to services and providing education and information about available resources for individ-
uals with mental health or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma  and discrimination
toward consumers  of mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist the member
in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
(22) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs of the patient as identified through  an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(23) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who meets qualification criteria  adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides  information, assistance, tools and support to
enable a patient to make  the best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances and
in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
(24) “Prepaid managed care health services organization” means a  managed dental care, mental
health or chemical dependency organization that contracts with the authority  under ORS 414.654
or with a coordinated care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide health  services to
medical assistance recipients.
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 11
(25) “Quality measure” means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks identi-
fied by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and the  metrics and scoring subcommittee in
accordance  with  ORS 413.017 (4) and 414.638  and the quality metrics developed by the Behav-
ioral Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017 (5) .
(26) “Resources” has the  meaning given that term in ORS 411.704. For eligibility purposes, “re-
sources” does not include charitable contributions  raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
(27)(a) “Youth support specialist” means an individual  who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who, based on a similar life  experience, provides supportive
services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is facing  or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
REPORTS TO LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY
SECTION 21.
(1) No later than November 1, 2021, the Oregon Health  Authority shall re-
port to the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245:
(a) Any changes needed to  contracts with counties, coordinated care organizations, pro-
viders or community based organizations to comply with the quality metrics and incentives
developed by the Behavioral Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017; and
(b) Recommendations to  improve the referral process for all levels of care delivered by
intensive behavioral treatment providers, as defined in ORS 430.717.
(2) No later than December 31, 2021, the Oregon Health Authority shall report  to the
Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245:
(a) Identified barriers, including legislative changes or changes to the  demonstration
project under section 1115 of the Social Security Act,  that are needed to apply the quality
metrics and incentives  developed by the committee to contracts with coordinated care or-
ganizations and counties;
(b) The  authority’s specific needs for data infrastructure to implement the quality met-
rics and incentives and recommendations for facilitating risk-sharing agreements  within the
health care delivery system to achieve the goals of the quality metrics; and
(c) Recommendations for counties  to share in the costs of a hospitalization at the Oregon
State Hospital for a patient beginning 30 days after a county is notified that the  patient no
longer needs hospital level care.
(3) No later than December 1, 2022, the Oregon Health Authority shall report to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to mental or behavioral health, in  the
manner provided in ORS 192.245 the findings of the study  under section 4 of this 2021 Act
and recommendations for future rate development.
IMPLEMENTATION DEADLINES
SECTION 22.
(1) The Behavioral Health Committee shall develop the quality metrics and
incentives described in ORS 413.017 no later than February 1, 2022.
(2) No later than January 1, 2023, the Oregon Health Authority  shall amend contracts for
the provision of behavioral health services to align with the quality metrics and incentives
developed by the Behavioral Health Committee under ORS 413.017.
CAPTIONS
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 12
SECTION 23. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
REPEALS
SECTION 24. (1) Section 3 of this 2021 Act is repealed on June 30, 2023.
(2) Section 4 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
(3) Section 7 of this 2021 Act is repealed on June 30, 2022.
(4) Section 14 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 25.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2086 (HB 2086-B) Page 13